lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 12371 Y 2
SFX 12371 izti izti/472 . 336
SFX 12371 iztis iztis/472 . 336

SFX 12372 Y 2
SFX 12372 izti izti/473 . 336
SFX 12372 iztis iztis/473 . 336

SFX 12383 Y 2
SFX 12383 izti yzta/474 . 337
SFX 12383 iztis yztasi/474 . 337

SFX 12384 Y 2
SFX 12384 izti yzta/475 . 337
SFX 12384 iztis yztasi/475 . 337

SFX 12385 Y 2
SFX 12385 izti yzta/476 . 337
SFX 12385 iztis yztasi/476 . 337

SFX 12386 Y 2
SFX 12386 izti yzta/477 . 337
SFX 12386 iztis yztasi/477 . 337

SFX 12387 Y 2
SFX 12387 izti yzta/478 . 337
SFX 12387 iztis yztasi/478 . 337

SFX 12388 Y 2
SFX 12388 izti yzta/479 . 337
SFX 12388 iztis yztasi/479 . 337

SFX 12389 Y 2
SFX 12389 izti yzta/480 . 337
SFX 12389 iztis yztasi/480 . 337

SFX 12390 Y 2
SFX 12390 izti yzta/481 . 337
SFX 12390 iztis yztasi/481 . 337

SFX 12391 Y 2
SFX 12391 izti yzta/482 . 337
SFX 12391 iztis yztasi/482 . 337

SFX 12401 Y 1
SFX 12401 izti yztie/483 . 337

SFX 12402 Y 1
SFX 12402 iztis yztie/484 . 337

SFX 12403 Y 2
SFX 12403 izti izo/485 . 338
SFX 12403 iztis izosi/485 . 338

SFX 12404 Y 2
SFX 12404 izti izo/486 . 338
SFX 12404 iztis izosi/486 . 338

SFX 12405 Y 2
SFX 12405 izti izo/487 . 338
SFX 12405 iztis izosi/487 . 338

SFX 12409 Y 2
SFX 12409 kšti kšti/464 . 336
SFX 12409 kštis kštis/464 . 336

SFX 12410 Y 2
SFX 12410 kšti kšti/465 . 336
SFX 12410 kštis kštis/465 . 336

SFX 12411 Y 2
SFX 12411 kšti kšti/466 . 336
SFX 12411 kštis kštis/466 . 336

SFX 12412 Y 2
SFX 12412 kšti kšti/467 . 336
SFX 12412 kštis kštis/467 . 336

SFX 12413 Y 2
SFX 12413 kšti kšti/468 . 336
SFX 12413 kštis kštis/468 . 336

SFX 12414 Y 2
SFX 12414 kšti kšti/469 . 336
SFX 12414 kštis kštis/469 . 336

SFX 12415 Y 2
SFX 12415 kšti kšti/470 . 336
SFX 12415 kštis kštis/470 . 336

SFX 12416 Y 2
SFX 12416 kšti kšti/471 . 336
SFX 12416 kštis kštis/471 . 336

SFX 12417 Y 2
SFX 12417 kšti kšti/472 . 336
SFX 12417 kštis kštis/472 . 336

SFX 12418 Y 2
SFX 12418 kšti kšti/473 . 336
SFX 12418 kštis kštis/473 . 336

SFX 12429 Y 2
SFX 12429 kšti ška/474 . 337
SFX 12429 kštis škasi/474 . 337

SFX 12430 Y 2
SFX 12430 kšti ška/475 . 337
SFX 12430 kštis škasi/475 . 337

SFX 12431 Y 2
SFX 12431 kšti ška/476 . 337
SFX 12431 kštis škasi/476 . 337

SFX 12432 Y 2
SFX 12432 kšti ška/477 . 337
SFX 12432 kštis škasi/477 . 337

SFX 12433 Y 2
SFX 12433 kšti ška/478 . 337
SFX 12433 kštis škasi/478 . 337

SFX 12434 Y 2
SFX 12434 kšti ška/479 . 337
SFX 12434 kštis škasi/479 . 337

SFX 12435 Y 2
SFX 12435 kšti ška/480 . 337
SFX 12435 kštis škasi/480 . 337

SFX 12436 Y 2
SFX 12436 kšti ška/481 . 337
SFX 12436 kštis škasi/481 . 337

SFX 12437 Y 2
SFX 12437 kšti ška/482 . 337
SFX 12437 kštis škasi/482 . 337

SFX 12447 Y 1
SFX 12447 kšti škie/483 . 337

SFX 12448 Y 1
SFX 12448 kštis škie/484 . 337

SFX 12449 Y 2
SFX 12449 kšti ško/485 . 338
SFX 12449 kštis škosi/485 . 338

SFX 12450 Y 2
SFX 12450 kšti ško/486 . 338
SFX 12450 kštis škosi/486 . 338

SFX 12451 Y 2
SFX 12451 kšti ško/487 . 338
SFX 12451 kštis škosi/487 . 338

SFX 12455 Y 2
SFX 12455 uiti uiti/464 . 336
SFX 12455 uitis uitis/464 . 336

SFX 12456 Y 2
SFX 12456 uiti uiti/465 . 336
SFX 12456 uitis uitis/465 . 336

SFX 12457 Y 2
SFX 12457 uiti uiti/466 . 336
SFX 12457 uitis uitis/466 . 336

SFX 12458 Y 2
SFX 12458 uiti uiti/467 . 336
SFX 12458 uitis uitis/467 . 336

SFX 12459 Y 2
SFX 12459 uiti uiti/468 . 336
SFX 12459 uitis uitis/468 . 336

SFX 12460 Y 2
SFX 12460 uiti uiti/469 . 336
SFX 12460 uitis uitis/469 . 336

SFX 12461 Y 2
SFX 12461 uiti uiti/470 . 336
SFX 12461 uitis uitis/470 . 336

SFX 12462 Y 2
SFX 12462 uiti uiti/471 . 336
SFX 12462 uitis uitis/471 . 336

SFX 12463 Y 2
SFX 12463 uiti uiti/472 . 336
SFX 12463 uitis uitis/472 . 336

SFX 12464 Y 2
SFX 12464 uiti uiti/473 . 336
SFX 12464 uitis uitis/473 . 336

SFX 12475 Y 2
SFX 12475 uiti ūja/474 . 337
SFX 12475 uitis ūjasi/474 . 337

SFX 12476 Y 2
SFX 12476 uiti ūja/475 . 337
SFX 12476 uitis ūjasi/475 . 337

SFX 12477 Y 2
SFX 12477 uiti ūja/476 . 337
SFX 12477 uitis ūjasi/476 . 337

SFX 12478 Y 2
SFX 12478 uiti ūja/477 . 337
SFX 12478 uitis ūjasi/477 . 337

SFX 12479 Y 2
SFX 12479 uiti ūja/478 . 337
SFX 12479 uitis ūjasi/478 . 337

SFX 12480 Y 2
SFX 12480 uiti ūja/479 . 337
SFX 12480 uitis ūjasi/479 . 337

SFX 12481 Y 2
SFX 12481 uiti ūja/480 . 337
SFX 12481 uitis ūjasi/480 . 337

SFX 12482 Y 2
SFX 12482 uiti ūja/481 . 337
SFX 12482 uitis ūjasi/481 . 337

SFX 12483 Y 2
SFX 12483 uiti ūja/482 . 337
SFX 12483 uitis ūjasi/482 . 337

SFX 12493 Y 1
SFX 12493 uiti ūjie/483 . 337

SFX 12494 Y 1
SFX 12494 uitis ūjie/484 . 337

SFX 12495 Y 2
SFX 12495 uiti ujo/485 . 338
SFX 12495 uitis ujosi/485 . 338

SFX 12496 Y 2
SFX 12496 uiti ujo/486 . 338
SFX 12496 uitis ujosi/486 . 338

SFX 12497 Y 2
SFX 12497 uiti ujo/487 . 338
SFX 12497 uitis ujosi/487 . 338

SFX 12501 Y 2
SFX 12501 ulti ulti/464 . 336
SFX 12501 ultis ultis/464 . 336

SFX 12502 Y 2
SFX 12502 ulti ulti/465 . 336
SFX 12502 ultis ultis/465 . 336

SFX 12503 Y 2
SFX 12503 ulti ulti/466 . 336
SFX 12503 ultis ultis/466 . 336

SFX 12504 Y 2
SFX 12504 ulti ulti/467 . 336
SFX 12504 ultis ultis/467 . 336

SFX 12505 Y 2
SFX 12505 ulti ulti/468 . 336
SFX 12505 ultis ultis/468 . 336

SFX 12506 Y 2
SFX 12506 ulti ulti/469 . 336
SFX 12506 ultis ultis/469 . 336

SFX 12507 Y 2
SFX 12507 ulti ulti/470 . 336
SFX 12507 ultis ultis/470 . 336

SFX 12508 Y 2
SFX 12508 ulti ulti/471 . 336
SFX 12508 ultis ultis/471 . 336

SFX 12509 Y 2
SFX 12509 ulti ulti/472 . 336
SFX 12509 ultis ultis/472 . 336

SFX 12510 Y 2
SFX 12510 ulti ulti/473 . 336
SFX 12510 ultis ultis/473 . 336

SFX 12521 Y 2
SFX 12521 ulti ūla/474 . 337
SFX 12521 ultis ūlasi/474 . 337

SFX 12522 Y 2
SFX 12522 ulti ūla/475 . 337
SFX 12522 ultis ūlasi/475 . 337

SFX 12523 Y 2
SFX 12523 ulti ūla/476 . 337
SFX 12523 ultis ūlasi/476 . 337

SFX 12524 Y 2
SFX 12524 ulti ūla/477 . 337
SFX 12524 ultis ūlasi/477 . 337

SFX 12525 Y 2
SFX 12525 ulti ūla/478 . 337
SFX 12525 ultis ūlasi/478 . 337

SFX 12526 Y 2
SFX 12526 ulti ūla/479 . 337
SFX 12526 ultis ūlasi/479 . 337

SFX 12527 Y 2
SFX 12527 ulti ūla/480 . 337
SFX 12527 ultis ūlasi/480 . 337

SFX 12528 Y 2
SFX 12528 ulti ūla/481 . 337
SFX 12528 ultis ūlasi/481 . 337

SFX 12529 Y 2
SFX 12529 ulti ūla/482 . 337
SFX 12529 ultis ūlasi/482 . 337

SFX 12539 Y 1
SFX 12539 ulti ūlie/483 . 337

SFX 12540 Y 1
SFX 12540 ultis ūlie/484 . 337

SFX 12541 Y 2
SFX 12541 ulti ulo/485 . 338
SFX 12541 ultis ulosi/485 . 338

SFX 12542 Y 2
SFX 12542 ulti ulo/486 . 338
SFX 12542 ultis ulosi/486 . 338

SFX 12543 Y 2
SFX 12543 ulti ulo/487 . 338
SFX 12543 ultis ulosi/487 . 338

SFX 12547 Y 2
SFX 12547 ūti ūti/464 . 336
SFX 12547 ūtis ūtis/464 . 336

SFX 12548 Y 2
SFX 12548 ūti ūti/494 . 336
SFX 12548 ūtis ūtis/494 . 336

SFX 12549 Y 2
SFX 12549 ūti ūti/466 . 336
SFX 12549 ūtis ūtis/466 . 336

SFX 12550 Y 2
SFX 12550 ūti ūti/467 . 336
SFX 12550 ūtis ūtis/467 . 336

SFX 12551 Y 2
SFX 12551 ūti ūti/468 . 336
SFX 12551 ūtis ūtis/468 . 336

SFX 12552 Y 2
SFX 12552 ūti ūti/469 . 336
SFX 12552 ūtis ūtis/469 . 336

SFX 12553 Y 2
SFX 12553 ūti ūti/470 . 336
SFX 12553 ūtis ūtis/470 . 336

SFX 12554 Y 2
SFX 12554 ūti ūti/471 . 336
SFX 12554 ūtis ūtis/471 . 336

SFX 12555 Y 2
SFX 12555 ūti ūti/472 . 336
SFX 12555 ūtis ūtis/472 . 336

SFX 12556 Y 2
SFX 12556 ūti ūti/473 . 336
SFX 12556 ūtis ūtis/473 . 336

SFX 12567 Y 6
SFX 12567 ūti ūva/474 . 337
SFX 12567 ūtis ūvasi/474 . 337
SFX 12567 ūti ūsta/474 . 337
SFX 12567 ūtis ūstasi/474 . 337
SFX 12567 ūti ūna/474 . 337
SFX 12567 ūtis ūnasi/474 . 337

SFX 12568 Y 6
SFX 12568 ūti ūva/475 . 337
SFX 12568 ūtis ūvasi/475 . 337
SFX 12568 ūti ūsta/475 . 337
SFX 12568 ūtis ūstasi/475 . 337
SFX 12568 ūti ūna/475 . 337
SFX 12568 ūtis ūnasi/475 . 337

SFX 12569 Y 6
SFX 12569 ūti ūva/476 . 337
SFX 12569 ūtis ūvasi/476 . 337
SFX 12569 ūti ūsta/476 . 337
SFX 12569 ūtis ūstasi/476 . 337
SFX 12569 ūti ūna/476 . 337
SFX 12569 ūtis ūnasi/476 . 337

AF 12455,12456,12475,12495,65521 # 125
AF 12547,12548,12567,12627,65521 # 262
AF 12409,12410,12429,12449,65521 # 424
AF 12547,12548,12567,12585,12586,12627,65521 # 450
