lt-LT_morphology.dic
apduiti/125	11
bežūti/262	11
neapduiti/125	33
nebepražūti/262	33
nebežūti/262	33
nepražūti/262	33
nežūti/262	33
pražūti/262	11
sučirkšti/424	11
tebeapduiti/125	11
tebežūti/262	11
tepražūti/262	11
težūti/262	11
žūti/450	11
